Idaho, session 2025, S1116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3531, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3531. ANNUAL STATEWIDE INDIRECT COST ALLOCATION PLAN. (1) The di-
vision of financial management shall develop an annual statewide indirect
cost allocation plan in accordance with 2 CFR 225 et seq. The central ser-
vice costs of the various central service agencies shall be allocated annu-
ally to the recipient state agencies, and such central service costs shall be
included in an agency's indirect cost plans for the purpose of determining an
indirect cost rate with the cognizant federal agency, and shall be included
in an agency's federal grant application.
(2) In conjunction with the respective state service agency, the di-
vision of financial management shall prepare an estimate of costs for state
budgeting purposes for services provided by the attorney general, the state
treasurer, the office of administrative hearings, and the state controller.
The division of financial management shall notify all state agencies of
these cost estimates for the next fiscal year on or before November 1. The
division of financial management and the legislative services office shall
allow state agencies to modify their budget requests in response to such
estimates.
(3) The division of financial management shall assess each recipient
agency up to one hundred percent (100%) of the amounts allocated in the
statewide cost allocation plan. Amounts so assessed shall be separately
accounted for and can be expended only after legislative appropriation.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-5285, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 52, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-5285, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-5285. OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS -- FEES ASSESSED FOR SER-
VICES. In conjunction with the office of administrative hearings, the divi-


sion of financial management shall, on or before November 1 of each year, de-
termine an amount to be billed to state agencies for the purposes of carrying
out the provisions of this chapter in accordance with the provisions of sec-
tion 67-3531, Idaho Code. Such amount shall be paid by each state agency in
the succeeding fiscal year to the indirect cost recovery fund. Before June
30 of each fiscal year, the state controller shall transfer an amount equal
to such deposits to the state general fund.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.